Utah statutes.
53A-11-1206.   Clubs -- Limitations and denials.

(1)  A school shall limit or deny authorization or school building use to a club or require changes prior to granting authorization or school building use:

(a)  as the school determines it to be necessary to:

(i)  protect the physical, emotional, psychological, or moral well-being of students and faculty;

(ii)  maintain order and discipline on school premises;

(iii)  prevent a material and substantial interference with the orderly conduct of a school's educational activities;

(iv)  protect the rights of parents or guardians and students;

(v)  maintain the boundaries of socially appropriate behavior; or

(vi)  ensure compliance with all applicable laws, rules, regulations, and policies; or

(b)  whose proposed charter and proposed activities indicate students or advisors in club related activities would as a substantial, material, or significant part of their conduct or means of expression:

(i)  encourage criminal or delinquent conduct;

(ii)  promote bigotry;

(iii)  involve human sexuality; or

(iv)  involve any effort to engage in or conduct mental health therapy, counseling, or psychological services for which a license would be required under state law.

(2)  A school governing board has the authority to determine whether any club meets the criteria of Subsection (1).

(3)  If a school or school governing board limits or denies authorization to a club, the school or school governing board shall provide, in writing, to the applicant the factual and legal basis for the limitation or denial.

(4)  A student's spontaneous expression of sentiments or opinions otherwise identified in Subsection 53A-13-302(1) is not prohibited.

